District of Columbia statutes.
7-2811

Penalties generally.

(a)

Unless otherwise specified, any person who violates a provision of this chapter shall be fined no less than $40 nor more than $100.

(b)

All fines levied pursuant to this chapter are civil in nature.

(c)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-107, § 12, 27 DCR 3760
Mar. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-99, § 2(m), 35 DCR 1051
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 18, 38 DCR 314
1981 Ed., § 6-3111.